Illinois, session 104th, SB2018.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Sections 2A-1.2 and 25-11 and by adding Section 2A-56 as 6follows: 7    (10 ILCS 5/2A-1.2)  (from Ch. 46, par. 2A-1.2)8    Sec. 2A-1.2. Consolidated schedule of elections; offices 9designated. 10    (a) At the general election in the appropriate 11even-numbered years, the following offices shall be filled or 12shall be on the ballot as otherwise required by this Code:13        (1) Elector of President and Vice President of the 14    United States.15        (2) United States Senator and United States 16    Representative.17        (3) State Executive Branch elected officers.18        (4) State Senator and State Representative.19        (5) County elected officers, including State's 20    Attorney, County Board member, County Commissioners, and 21    elected President of the County Board or County Chief 22    Executive.23        (6) Circuit Court Clerk.  SB2018- 2 -LRB104 10452 KTG 20527 b1        (7) Regional Superintendent of Schools, except in 2    counties or educational service regions in which that 3    office has been abolished.4        (8) Judges of the Supreme, Appellate and Circuit 5    Courts, on the question of retention, to fill vacancies 6    and newly created judicial offices.7        (9) (Blank).8        (10) Trustee of the Metropolitan Water Reclamation 9    District of Greater Chicago, and elected Trustee of other 10    Sanitary Districts.11        (11) Special District elected officers, not otherwise 12    designated in this Section, where the statute creating or 13    authorizing the creation of the district requires an 14    annual election and permits or requires election of 15    candidates of political parties.16        (12) Beginning with the 2024 general election, the 17    elected members of the Chicago Board of Education; the 18    election of members of the Chicago Board of Education 19    shall be a nonpartisan election as provided for under this 20    Code and may be conducted on a separate ballot. 21    (b) At the general primary election:22        (1) in each even-numbered year candidates of political 23    parties shall be nominated for those offices to be filled 24    at the general election in that year, except where 25    pursuant to law nomination of candidates of political 26    parties is made by caucus.  SB2018- 3 -LRB104 10452 KTG 20527 b1        (2) in the appropriate even-numbered years the 2    political party offices of State central committeeperson, 3    township committeeperson, ward committeeperson, and 4    precinct committeeperson shall be filled and delegates and 5    alternate delegates to the National nominating conventions 6    shall be elected as may be required pursuant to this Code. 7    In the even-numbered years in which a Presidential 8    election is to be held, candidates in the Presidential 9    preference primary shall also be on the ballot.10        (3) in each even-numbered year, where the municipality 11    has provided for annual elections to elect municipal 12    officers pursuant to Section 6(f) or Section 7 of Article 13    VII of the Constitution, pursuant to the Illinois 14    Municipal Code or pursuant to the municipal charter, the 15    offices of such municipal officers shall be filled at an 16    election held on the date of the general primary election, 17    provided that the municipal election shall be a 18    nonpartisan election where required by the Illinois 19    Municipal Code. For partisan municipal elections in 20    even-numbered years, a primary to nominate candidates for 21    municipal office to be elected at the general primary 22    election shall be held on the Tuesday 6 weeks preceding 23    that election.24        (4) in each school district which has adopted the 25    provisions of Article 33 of the School Code, successors to 26    the members of the board of education whose terms expire   SB2018- 4 -LRB104 10452 KTG 20527 b1    in the year in which the general primary is held shall be 2    elected.3    (c) At the consolidated election in the appropriate 4odd-numbered years, the following offices shall be filled:5        (1) Municipal officers, provided that in 6    municipalities in which candidates for alderperson or 7    other municipal office are not permitted by law to be 8    candidates of political parties, the runoff election where 9    required by law, or the nonpartisan election where 10    required by law, shall be held on the date of the 11    consolidated election; and provided further, in the case 12    of municipal officers provided for by an ordinance 13    providing the form of government of the municipality 14    pursuant to Section 7 of Article VII of the Constitution, 15    such offices shall be filled by election or by runoff 16    election as may be provided by such ordinance;17        (2) Village and incorporated town library directors;18        (3) City boards of stadium commissioners;19        (4) Commissioners of park districts;20        (5) Trustees of public library districts;21        (6) Special District elected officers, not otherwise 22    designated in this Section, where the statute creating or 23    authorizing the creation of the district permits or 24    requires election of candidates of political parties;25        (7) Township officers, including township park 26    commissioners, township library directors, and boards of   SB2018- 5 -LRB104 10452 KTG 20527 b1    managers of community buildings, and Multi-Township 2    Assessors;3        (8) Highway commissioners and road district clerks;4        (9) Members of school boards in school districts which 5    adopt Article 33 of the School Code;6        (10) The directors and chair of the Chain O Lakes - Fox 7    River Waterway Management Agency;8        (11) Forest preserve district commissioners elected 9    under Section 3.5 of the Downstate Forest Preserve 10    District Act;11        (12) Elected members of school boards, school 12    trustees, directors of boards of school directors, 13    trustees of county boards of school trustees (except in 14    counties or educational service regions having a 15    population of 2,000,000 or more inhabitants) and members 16    of boards of school inspectors, except school boards in 17    school districts that adopt Article 33 of the School Code;18        (13) Members of Community College district boards;19        (14) Trustees of Fire Protection Districts;20        (15) Commissioners of the Springfield Metropolitan 21    Exposition and Auditorium Authority;22        (16) Elected Trustees of Tuberculosis Sanitarium 23    Districts;24        (17) Elected Officers of special districts not 25    otherwise designated in this Section for which the law 26    governing those districts does not permit candidates of   SB2018- 6 -LRB104 10452 KTG 20527 b1    political parties; and .2        (18) Commissioners of the Veterans Assistance 3    Commission elected under Section 4.5 of the Military 4    Veterans Assistance Act.5    (d) At the consolidated primary election in each 6odd-numbered year, candidates of political parties shall be 7nominated for those offices to be filled at the consolidated 8election in that year, except where pursuant to law nomination 9of candidates of political parties is made by caucus, and 10except those offices listed in paragraphs (12) through (17) of 11subsection (c).12    At the consolidated primary election in the appropriate 13odd-numbered years, the mayor, clerk, treasurer, and 14alderpersons shall be elected in municipalities in which 15candidates for mayor, clerk, treasurer, or alderperson are not 16permitted by law to be candidates of political parties, 17subject to runoff elections to be held at the consolidated 18election as may be required by law, and municipal officers 19shall be nominated in a nonpartisan election in municipalities 20in which pursuant to law candidates for such office are not 21permitted to be candidates of political parties.22    At the consolidated primary election in the appropriate 23odd-numbered years, municipal officers shall be nominated or 24elected, or elected subject to a runoff, as may be provided by 25an ordinance providing a form of government of the 26municipality pursuant to Section 7 of Article VII of the   SB2018- 7 -LRB104 10452 KTG 20527 b1Constitution.2    (e) (Blank). 3    (f) At any election established in Section 2A-1.1, public 4questions may be submitted to voters pursuant to this Code and 5any special election otherwise required or authorized by law 6or by court order may be conducted pursuant to this Code.7    Notwithstanding the regular dates for election of officers 8established in this Article, whenever a referendum is held for 9the establishment of a political subdivision whose officers 10are to be elected, the initial officers shall be elected at the 11election at which such referendum is held if otherwise so 12provided by law. In such cases, the election of the initial 13officers shall be subject to the referendum.14    Notwithstanding the regular dates for election of 15officials established in this Article, any community college 16district which becomes effective by operation of law pursuant 17to Section 6-6.1 of the Public Community College Act, as now or 18hereafter amended, shall elect the initial district board 19members at the next regularly scheduled election following the 20effective date of the new district.21    (g) At any election established in Section 2A-1.1, if in 22any precinct there are no offices or public questions required 23to be on the ballot under this Code then no election shall be 24held in the precinct on that date.25    (h) There may be conducted a referendum in accordance with 26the provisions of Division 6-4 of the Counties Code.  SB2018- 8 -LRB104 10452 KTG 20527 b1(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21; 102-177, eff. 6-1-22; 2102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-691, eff. 12-17-21.) 3    (10 ILCS 5/2A-56 new)4    Sec. 2A-56. Veterans assistance commissions; 5commissioners; time of election. A veteran assistance 6commissioner elected under Section 4.5 of the Military 7Veterans Assistance Act shall be elected at each consolidated 8election to succeed each incumbent commissioner whose term 9expires before the following consolidated election. 10    (10 ILCS 5/25-11)  (from Ch. 46, par. 25-11)11    Sec. 25-11. Except as otherwise provided in this 12paragraph, when a vacancy occurs in any elective county 13office, or in a county of less than 3,000,000 population in the 14office of clerk of the circuit court, in a county which is not 15a home rule unit, the county board or board of county 16commissioners shall declare that such vacancy exists and 17notification thereof shall be given to the county central 18committee or the appropriate county board or board of county 19commissioners district committee of each established political 20party within 3 days of the occurrence of the vacancy. The 21vacancy shall be filled within 60 days by appointment of the 22chair of the county board or board of county commissioners 23with the advice and consent of the county board or board of 24county commissioners. In counties other than Champaign County   SB2018- 9 -LRB104 10452 KTG 20527 b1operating under the county executive form of government under 2Division 2-5 of the Counties Code, when a vacancy occurs in an 3elected county office other than in the office of an elected 4member of the county board, the county executive shall declare 5that such vacancy exists and then notification of the vacancy 6shall be given to the county central committee of each 7established political party within 3 days of the occurrence of 8the vacancy, and the vacancy shall be filled within 60 days by 9appointment of the county executive with the advice and 10consent of the county board. However, when a vacancy occurs in 11the office of an elected member of the county board in a county 12other than Champaign County that is operating under the county 13executive form of government under Division 2-5 of the 14Counties Code, the elected county board speaker or county 15board chair, as the case may be, shall declare that such 16vacancy exists and then notification shall be given to the 17appropriate county board district committee of each 18established political party within 3 days of the occurrence of 19the vacancy, and the vacancy shall be filled within 60 days by 20appointment of the elected county board speaker or county 21board chair, as the case may be, with the advice and consent of 22the county board. In Champaign County while operating under 23the county executive form of government under Division 2-5 of 24the Counties Code, when a vacancy occurs in an elected county 25office or in the office of an elected member of the county 26board, the elected county board speaker or county board chair,   SB2018- 10 -LRB104 10452 KTG 20527 b1as the case may be, shall declare that such vacancy exists and 2then notification shall be given to the county central 3committee or the appropriate county board district committee 4of each established political party within 3 days of the 5occurrence of the vacancy; and the vacancy shall be filled 6within 60 days by appointment of the elected county board 7speaker or county board chair, as the case may be, with the 8advice and consent of the county board. In counties in which 9forest preserve district commissioners are elected by 10districts and are not also members of the county board, 11however, vacancies in the office of forest preserve district 12commissioner shall be filled within 60 days by appointment of 13the president of the forest preserve district board of 14commissioners with the advice and consent of the forest 15preserve district board of commissioners. In counties in which 16the forest preserve district president is not also a member of 17the county board, vacancies in the office of forest preserve 18district president shall be filled within 60 days by the 19forest preserve district board of commissioners by appointing 20one of the commissioners to serve as president. The appointee 21shall be a member of the same political party as the person he 22succeeds was at the time of his election and shall be otherwise 23eligible to serve. The appointee shall serve the remainder of 24the unexpired term. However, if more than 28 months remain in 25the term, the appointment shall be until the next general 26election at which time the vacated office shall be filled by   SB2018- 11 -LRB104 10452 KTG 20527 b1election for the remainder of the term. In the case of a 2vacancy in a seat on a county board or board of county 3commissioners which has been divided into districts under 4Section 2-3003 or 2-4006.5 of the Counties Code, the appointee 5must also be a resident of the county board or county 6commission district. If a county commissioner ceases to reside 7in the district that he or she represents, a vacancy in that 8office exists. In the case of a vacancy in the office of 9veteran assistance commissioner, the vacancy shall be filled 10within 60 days by appointment of the president of the board of 11commissioners with the advice and consent of the other 12commissioners. The appointee shall be eligible to serve as 13commissioner. The appointee shall serve the remainder of the 14unexpired term. However, if more than 28 months remain in the 15term, the appointment shall be until the next consolidated 16election at which time the vacated office of veteran 17assistance commissioner shall be filled by election for the 18remainder of the term. 19    Except as otherwise provided by county ordinance or by 20law, in any county which is a home rule unit, vacancies in 21elective county offices, other than the office of chief 22executive officer, and vacancies in the office of clerk of the 23circuit court in a county of less than 3,000,000 population, 24shall be filled by the county board or board of county 25commissioners.26(Source: P.A. 102-1120, eff. 1-23-23.)   SB2018- 12 -LRB104 10452 KTG 20527 b1    Section 10. The Military Veterans Assistance Act is 2amended by changing Section 4 and by adding Section 4.5 as 3follows: 4    (330 ILCS 45/4)  (from Ch. 23, par. 3084)5    Sec. 4. 6    (a) Prior to January 1, 2026, Upon the taking effect of 7this Act, the commander of any veteran service organization or 8any properly created Veterans Assistance Commission, which 9shall undertake the assistance of military veterans and their 10families, as hereinbefore provided, before the acts of the 11commander, quartermaster, or commandant shall be operative in 12any city or town, shall file with the city clerk of such city 13or town clerk of such town, or administrator of military 14veterans assistance of such town or county, a notice that said 15veteran service organization or Veterans Assistance Commission 16intends to undertake such assistance as is provided by this 17Act, and such notice shall contain the names of the assistance 18committee of the veteran service organization or Veterans 19Assistance Commission in such city or town, and the commander 20and other officers of said veteran service organization or 21Veterans Assistance Commission. And the commander of the 22veteran service organization or Veterans Assistance Commission 23shall annually thereafter, during the month of October, file a 24similar notice with the city or town clerk, or the   SB2018- 13 -LRB104 10452 KTG 20527 b1administrator of military veterans assistance, also a detailed 2statement of the amount of assistance furnished during the 3preceding year, with the names of all persons to whom such 4assistance shall have been furnished, together with a brief 5statement in such case from the assistance committee upon 6whose recommendation the orders were drawn. Any person who 7fails or neglects so to do at the time required by this Act 8shall be guilty of a petty offense and fined $250 to be 9recovered in the name of the county in the circuit court.10    (b) After January 1, 2026, the commander of any veteran 11service organization or any properly created Veterans 12Assistance Commission, which shall undertake the assistance of 13military veterans and their families, as hereinbefore 14provided, before the acts of the commander, quartermaster, or 15commandant shall be operative in any city or town, shall file 16with the city clerk of such city or town clerk of such town, or 17administrator of military veterans assistance of such town or 18county, a notice that said veteran service organization or 19Veterans Assistance Commission intends to undertake such 20assistance as is provided by this Act. After filing such 21notice with the clerk, candidates for elected commissioner 22shall file nominating petitions with the clerk in accordance 23with Section 10-3.1 of the Election Code. 24(Source: P.A. 102-732, eff. 1-1-23.) 25    (330 ILCS 45/4.5 new)  SB2018- 14 -LRB104 10452 KTG 20527 b1    Sec. 4.5. Veterans Assistance Commission; commissioner 2elections.3    (a) For every Veterans Assistance Commission properly 4created under subsection (a) of Section 4 prior to January 1, 52026 and for every Veterans Assistance Commission properly 6created under subsection (b) of Section 4 after January 1, 72026, the commissioners shall be elected as provided in this 8Section, beginning with the first consolidated election 9following January 1, 2026. There shall be 7 elected 10commissioners, elected from the district at large. Each 11commissioner must be a resident of the district and a veteran. 12Candidates for elected commissioner shall file nominating 13petitions with the clerk in accordance with Section 10-3.1 of 14the Election Code. The terms of all elected commissioners 15shall commence on the third Monday of the month following the 16month of election. No party designation shall appear on the 17ballot for the election of commissioners. The terms of all 18officers who hold their position in accordance with the 19process provided for in subsection (a) of Section 4 shall 20expire on the third Monday of the month following the month of 21the first election of commissioners in that city under this 22Section.23    (b) The initial elected commissioners shall, no later than 2445 days after taking office, divide themselves publicly by lot 25as equally as possible into 2 groups. Commissioners or their 26successors from one group shall be elected for terms of 4   SB2018- 15 -LRB104 10452 KTG 20527 b1years; the initial elected commissioners from the second group 2shall serve for terms of 2 years, and their successors shall be 3elected for terms of 4 years.4    (c) The commissioners shall elect from among their number 5a president of the board of commissioners.6    (d) Whenever a vacancy occurs in the office of 7commissioner, whether by death, resignation, refusal to 8qualify, no longer residing in the district, or for any other 9reason, the board of commissioners shall declare that a 10vacancy exists. The vacancy shall be filled within 60 days by 11appointment of the president of the board of commissioners, 12with the advice and consent of the other commissioners. The 13appointee shall be eligible to serve as commissioner. The 14appointee shall serve the remainder of the unexpired term. If, 15however, more than 28 months remain in the term, the 16appointment shall be until the next consolidated election, at 17which time the vacated office of commissioner shall be filled 18by election for the remainder of the term.19    If a vacancy occurs in the office of president of the board 20of commissioners, the remaining commissioners shall elect one 21of their number to serve as president for the balance of the 22unexpired term of the president in whose office the vacancy 23occurred.24    (e) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, elected 25commissioners shall have the same powers and duties, and shall 26be entitled to the same compensation, as enjoyed by   SB2018- 16 -LRB104 10452 KTG 20527 b1commissioners before January 1, 2026. 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 3becoming law.